Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-219.02
Village; dissolution; property; sale; notice.

The county treasurer shall, before selling any property under section 17-219.01, give notice of the sale of such property in the same manner as notice is given when lands are sold under execution by the county sheriff, and the sale shall likewise be conducted in the same manner as execution sales.

Laws 1935, c. 158, § 2, p. 581;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-228;

R.S.1943, § 17-219.02;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 17-227;

Laws 1998, LB 1346, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 85.
August 24, 2017